Utah statutes.
7-9-31.   Shares held in trust.

(1) Shares may be issued to and deposits received in the name of a minor, and these shares and deposits may, in the discretion of the board of directors, be withdrawn by the minor or by his parent or guardian.

(2)  A credit union share account, share certificate, deposit, or deposit certificate may be held  in trust provided that the trustor, trustee, or primary beneficiary is a member of the credit union.

(3)  The trustee of the trust meeting the requirements of Subsection (2) shall exercise the rights of the trust as a member of the credit union.



Amended by Chapter 182, 1996 General Session

